Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 43-117 of Title 11, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A municipality may exercise the authority under this act
regardless of whether the municipality has adopted local amendments
to the International Building Code.
B. A municipality may authorize an apartment building to have a
single stairway only if the building:
1. Does not have more than six stories above grade plane and is
not a high-rise as defined by the International Building code, as
adopted by the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission;
2. Does not have more than four dwelling units on any floor;
Req. No. 14215 Page 1

3. Has automatic sprinkler locations in each interior exit
stairway, regardless of the type of stairway construction, that
comply with the requirements prescribed by National Fire Protection
Association Standard 13 for combustible stairways;
4. Has:
a. an exterior stairway, or
b. an interior exit stairway for which the doors:
(1) into the stairway from the interior of the
building swing into the stairway regardless of
the occupant load served, and
(2) from the interior exit stairway to the building
exterior swing in the direction of exit travel;
5. Has interior exit stairway enclosures that:
a. have a fire resistance rating of not less than two (2)
hours, and
b. do not contain an elevator opening;
6. Has on each floor a corridor from each dwelling unit entry
or exit door to an interior exit stairway, including any related
exit passageway, that has a fire resistance rating of at least one
(1) hour;
7. Does not have more than twenty (20) feet between the entry
or exit door of a dwelling unit and an exit stairway;
8. Does not have more than one hundred twenty-five (125) feet
of exit access travel distance;
Req. No. 14215 Page 2

9. Has an exit serving the portion of the building that
contains two or more dwelling units that does not discharge through
a portion of the building with a different occupancy category,
including an accessory parking garage;
10. Has an exit that terminates in an egress court for which
the court depth does not exceed the court width, unless it is
possible to exit the egress court to the public way in either
direction;
11. Does not have an opening within ten (10) feet of an
unprotected opening into an exit stairway other than a required exit
door that has a fire resistance rating of at least one (1) hour;
12. Has emergency escape and rescue openings that comply with
Section 1031 of the International Building Code, as adopted by the
Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission, on each floor served by a
single exit;
13. Does not have an electrical receptacle in an interior exit
stairway; and
14. Has an automatic smoke and fire detection system that
activates an occupant notification system that complies with Section
907.5 of the International Building Code as adopted under Section
214.216 installed in each:
a. common space outside of a dwelling unit,
b. laundry room, mechanical equipment room, and storage
room,
Req. No. 14215 Page 3

c. interior corridor serving a dwelling unit, and
d. main floor landing or interior or exterior exit
stairway.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14215 MJ 12/04/25


















Req. No. 14215 Page 4